Hawaii statutes.
§657-11 Recoveries authorized by federal
statute. Whenever any federal statute provides for damages or equitable
relief and neither the federal statute nor any specific state statute specifies
the period within which suit may be brought, the suit, if brought in a state
court, shall be commenced within two years from the date the cause of action
arises or be thereafter barred. [L 1945, c 174, §1; RL 1955, §241-10; HRS
§657-11; am L 1972, c 105, §1(f); am L 1986, c 337, §1]

Case Notes

Does not apply to actions brought under 42 U.S.C. 1983. 749
F.2d 588 (1984).

Applicable to breach of Railway Labor Act; tolling of
limitations period. 790 F.2d 727 (1986).

Two-year statute of limitations, rather than six-month
catchall statute of limitations in National Labor Relations Act, applied to
action brought under employee protection program of Airline Deregulation Act.
940 F.2d 1312 (1991).

Does not apply to action for redress for deprivation of civil
rights. 402 F. Supp. 95 (1975).

Section may not apply to claims filed pursuant to SEC Rules
103-5 or §17(a) of the Securities Act of 1933 because no new liability is
imposed. 501 F. Supp. 830 (1980).

Limitation period under this section applied because Railway
Labor Act "imposes a new liability". 525 F. Supp. 874 (1981).

Unconstitutionally discriminates against actions brought
under federal statutes. 574 F. Supp. 1510 (1983).

Section was constitutional as applied to action brought under
42 U.S.C. 1983. 575 F. Supp. 1510 (1983).

Applies to actions brought under Racketeer Influenced and
Corrupt Organizations Act. 619 F. Supp. 585 (1985).

Application of statute of limitations for Labor Management
Act. 687 F. Supp. 1453 (1988).

Applies to actions brought in state courts; §657-1 was
applied to federal action. 751 F. Supp. 1426 (1990).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next